klingon.lexc
! REFERENCES
! https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Klingon_grammar
! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e5Did-eVQDc

Multichar_Symbols [AUGMENTATIVE] [DIMINUTIVE] [ENDEARMENT] [SOCALLED] [DUBITATIVE] [ACCURATE] [THIS] [THAT] [LOCATIVE] [ABLATIVE] [CAUSAL] [DATIVE] [TOPIC] [ALL-OVER-THE-PLACE] @U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@ @U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@ @D.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@ @U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@ @U.NOUNTYPE.LOCATION@ @D.NOUNTYPE.LOCATION@ [NEG] [1P] [2P] [3P] [SG] [PL] [PL-IRREGULAR] [OBJ-1P] [OBJ-2P] [OBJ-3P] [OBJ-SG] [OBJ-PL] [INDICATIVE] [IMPERATIVE] [REFLEXIVE] [RECIPROCAL] [REQUIRED] [WILLING] [PREPARED] [SET-UP] [AFRAID] [STATECHANGE] [RESUME] [CAUSATIVE] [UNDEFINED-SUBJ] [CAPABLE] [BEST] [CERTAIN] [UNCERTAIN] [OBVIOUS] [PERFECT] [PERFECTPURPOSE] [CONTINUOUS] [CONTINUOUSEND] [HONOR] [PERSON] [DVN] [INTEROGATIVE] [BEFORE] [SIMULTANEOUS] [AFTER] [CONDITIONAL] [CAUSE] [RELATIVE] [PURPOSE] [REFUSE] [EMPHASIS] [REVERSE] @U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@ @U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@ @U.MOOD.INFINITIVE@ @D.MOOD@ @R.MOOD@ @D.VERBTYPE1.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE1.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE2.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE2.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE3.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE3.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE4.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE4.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE5.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE5.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE6.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE6.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE7.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE7.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE8.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE8.ON@ @D.VERBTYPE9.ON@ @P.VERBTYPE9.ON@ @P.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@ @R.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@ @C.INDICATIVE@ @D.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@ @P.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@ @R.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@ @U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@ @D.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@ @R.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@ @U.VERBTYPE.DYNAMIC@ [ORDINAL] [REPEATCOUNT] @P.POS.ADVERB@ @D.POS.ADVERB@ @R.POS.ADVERB@ [ADV] [NUMBER] @P.MULTIPLE1234567.ON@ @D.MULTIPLE1234567.ON@ @P.MULTIPLE123456.ON@ @D.MULTIPLE123456.ON@ @P.MULTIPLE12345.ON@ @D.MULTIPLE12345.ON@ @P.MULTIPLE1234.ON@ @D.MULTIPLE1234.ON@ @P.MULTIPLE123.ON@ @D.MULTIPLE123.ON@ @P.MULTIPLE12.ON@ @D.MULTIPLE12.ON@ @P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@ @D.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@ @P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@ @D.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@ @R.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@ [POSSESSIVE-1P-SG] [POSSESSIVE-2P-SG] [POSSESSIVE-3P-SG] [POSSESSIVE-1P-PL] [POSSESSIVE-2P-PL] [POSSESSIVE-3P-PL] [PRONOUN] [CONJ] [N] [V] [ADV] [ADJ] [EXCLAMATION] [NAME] [QUESTION] [STATIVE] @P.OBJECT.NONE@ @R.OBJECT.NONE@ @U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@ @U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@ [DEROGATORY]

LEXICON Root
						Verb; ! Includes Adjective part-of-speech via adjectival verbs
						Noun;
						LeftOverWordForms;

! ##########################
! ########## VERB ##########
! ##########################

LEXICON Verb
						VerbPrefix;

LEXICON VerbPrefix
@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@				VerbIndicativePrefix;
@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@				VerbImperativePrefix;
@U.MOOD.INFINITIVE@				VerbStem;


LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix
@U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@[1P][SG]:@U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@				VerbIndicativePrefix1PSG;
@U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@[2P][SG]:@U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@				VerbIndicativePrefix2PSG;
@U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@[3P][SG]:@U.SUBJECT.SINGULAR@				VerbIndicativePrefix3PSG;
@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@[1P][PL]:@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@					VerbIndicativePrefix1PPL;
@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@[2P][PL]:@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@					VerbIndicativePrefix2PPL;
@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@[3P][PL]:@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@					VerbIndicativePrefix3PPL;
@P.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@							VerbIndicativePrefixUnspecified;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix1PSG
@P.OBJECT.NONE@:@P.OBJECT.NONE@jI		VerbStem; ! No Object
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:qa				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:vI				VerbStem;
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:Sa				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:vI				VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix2PSG
@P.OBJECT.NONE@:@P.OBJECT.NONE@bI		VerbStem; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:cho				VerbStem;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:Da				VerbStem;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:ju				VerbStem;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:Da				VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix3PSG
@P.OBJECT.NONE@					VerbStem; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:mu				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:Du				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:nu				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:lI				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:0				VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix1PPL
@P.OBJECT.NONE@:@P.OBJECT.NONE@ma		VerbStem; ! No Object
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:pI				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:wI				VerbStem;
![OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:re				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:DI				VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix2PPL
@P.OBJECT.NONE@:@P.OBJECT.NONE@Su		VerbStem; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:tu				VerbStem;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:bo				VerbStem;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:che				VerbStem;
![OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:bo				VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefix3PPL
@P.OBJECT.NONE@					VerbStem; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:mu				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:nI				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:lu				VerbStem;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:nu				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:lI				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:0				VerbStem;

LEXICON VerbIndicativePrefixUnspecified
@P.OBJECT.NONE@					VerbStem; ! No Object
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:vI				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-SG]:Da				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:0				VerbStem;
[OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:wI				VerbStem;
[OBJ-2P][OBJ-PL]:bo				VerbStem;
[OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:lu				VerbStem;


LEXICON VerbImperativePrefix
@P.OBJECT.NONE@[2P][SG]:@P.OBJECT.NONE@yI	VerbStem;
[2P][SG][OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:HI			VerbStem;
[2P][SG][OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:yI			VerbStem;
[2P][SG][OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:gho			VerbStem;
[2P][SG][OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:tI			VerbStem;
@P.OBJECT.NONE@[2P][PL]:@P.OBJECT.NONE@pe	VerbStem;
[2P][PL][OBJ-1P][OBJ-SG]:HI			VerbStem;
[2P][PL][OBJ-3P][OBJ-SG]:yI			VerbStem;
[2P][PL][OBJ-1P][OBJ-PL]:gho			VerbStem;
[2P][PL][OBJ-3P][OBJ-PL]:tI			VerbStem;


LEXICON VerbStem
@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@				StativeVerb;
@U.VERBTYPE.DYNAMIC@				DynamicVerb;

LEXICON VerbSuffix
@D.VERBTYPE9.ON@				VerbRoversSuffix;
						VerbType1Gate;
						VerbType2Gate;
						VerbType3Gate;
						VerbType4Gate;
						VerbType5Gate;
						VerbType6Gate;
						VerbType7Gate;
						VerbType8Gate;
						VerbType9Gate;
[V]@U.VERBTYPE.DYNAMIC@:@U.VERBTYPE.DYNAMIC@								VerbMoodTag;
[V][STATIVE]@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@:@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@						VerbMoodTag;
[V][STATIVE]@U.MOOD.INFINITIVE@@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@:@U.MOOD.INFINITIVE@@U.VERBTYPE.STATIVE@	NounType5Suffix; ! Type-5 noun suffixes that would normally be attached to the noun are instead attached to the ADJECTIVAL (stative) verb;


LEXICON VerbRoversSuffix
! "These suffixes have no defined position, and can go after the verb stem or after any suffix – even another rover – except after a type-9 suffix or where the result would be meaningless. They modify whatever directly precedes them."
[NEG]@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@:@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@be'			VerbSuffix;
[NEG]@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@@P.VERBTYPE8.ON@@D.VERBTYPE9.ON@@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@:@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@@P.VERBTYPE8.ON@@D.VERBTYPE9.ON@@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@Qo'			VerbSuffix; ! "Unlike {-be',} the position of {-Qo'} does not change: it occurs last, unless followed by a Type 9 suffix. Nevertheless, it is considered a rover because it is the imperative counterpart to {-be'.}" - The Klingon Dictionary
[REFUSE]@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@:@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@Qo'			VerbSuffix;
[EMPHASIS]:qu'								VerbSuffix;
[REVERSE]:Ha'								VerbSuffix;

LEXICON VerbType1Gate
@D.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@		VerbType1Suffix;

! Example: {chop} <to bite>  {chop'egh} <to bite oneself>

LEXICON StativeVerb
rIn[to-be-accomplished,finished]:rIn		VerbSuffix;
vaQ[to-be-aggressive]:vaQ			VerbSuffix;
loj[to-be-all-gone]:loj			VerbSuffix;
mob[to-be-alone]:mob				VerbSuffix;
nID[to-attempt,to-try]:nID			VerbSuffix;
qay'[to-be-a-problem,hassle]:qay'		VerbSuffix;
tIn[to-be-big]:tIn				VerbSuffix;
Dal[to-be-boring]:Dal				VerbSuffix;
jot[to-be-calm]:jot				VerbSuffix;
Say'[to-be-clean]:Say'				VerbSuffix;
Huv[to-be-clear,unobstructed]:Huv		VerbSuffix;
bIr[to-be-cold]:bIr				VerbSuffix;
ngeb[to-be-conterfeit,to-be-false,to-be-fake]:ngeb	VerbSuffix;
maw'[to-be-crazy]:maw'				VerbSuffix;
Hurgh[to-be-dark]:Hurgh			VerbSuffix;
lam[to-be-dirty]:lam				VerbSuffix;
ngeD[to-be-easy]:ngeD				VerbSuffix;
po'[to-be-expert,to-be-skilled]:po'		VerbSuffix;
pI'[to-be-fat]:pI'				VerbSuffix;
qu'[to-be-fierce]:qu'				VerbSuffix;
SuD[to-be-green,blue,yellow]:SuD		VerbSuffix;
let[to-be-hard-like-a-rock]:let		VerbSuffix;
joch[to-be-harmful]:joch			VerbSuffix;
quv[to-be-honored]:quv				VerbSuffix;
ghung[to-be-hungry]:ghung			VerbSuffix;
jub[to-be-immortal]:jub			VerbSuffix;
Daj[to-be-interesting]:Daj			VerbSuffix;
wov[to-be-light,bright]:wov			VerbSuffix;
tIq[to-be-long]:tIq				VerbSuffix;
ghIH[to-be-messy,to-be-sloppy]:ghIH		VerbSuffix;
bIt[to-be-nervous]:bIt				VerbSuffix;
chuS[to-be-noisy]:chuS				VerbSuffix;
poS[to-be-open]:poS				VerbSuffix;
Don[to-be-parallel]:Don			VerbSuffix;
Hem[to-be-proud]:Hem				VerbSuffix;
Hop[to-be-remote,to-be-far]:Hop		VerbSuffix;
lugh[to-be-right,to-be-correct]:lugh		VerbSuffix;
mach[to-be-small]:mach				VerbSuffix;
boch[to-be-shiny]:boch				VerbSuffix;
nap[to-be-simple]:nap				VerbSuffix;
le'[to-be-special,to-be-exceptional]:le'	VerbSuffix;
woch[to-be-tall]:woch				VerbSuffix;
Doy'[to-be-tired]:Doy'				VerbSuffix;
yoy[to-be-upside-down]:yoy			VerbSuffix;
puj[to-be-weak]:puj				VerbSuffix;
chIS[to-be-white]:chIS				VerbSuffix;
muj[to-be-wrong]:muj				VerbSuffix;
LEXICON DynamicVerb
chav[to-achieve]:chav				VerbSuffix;
Ho'[to-admire]:Ho'				VerbSuffix;
qeS[to-advise]:qeS				VerbSuffix;
choH[to-alter]:choH				VerbSuffix;
jang[to-answer,to-reply]:jang			VerbSuffix;
HIv[to-attack]:HIv				VerbSuffix;
moj[to-become]:moj				VerbSuffix;
magh[to-betray]:magh				VerbSuffix;
pIch[to-blame]:pIch				VerbSuffix;
ngIp[to-borrow]:ngIp				VerbSuffix;
ghor[to-break]:ghor				VerbSuffix;
meQ[to-burn]:meQ				VerbSuffix;
SaH[to-care]:SaH				VerbSuffix;
tlha'[to-chase]:tlha'				VerbSuffix;
So'[to-cloak,to-hide]:So'			VerbSuffix;
ra'[to-command]:ra'				VerbSuffix;
chargh[to-conquer]:chargh			VerbSuffix;
ngaS[to-contain]:ngaS				VerbSuffix;
SeH[to-control]:SeH				VerbSuffix;
Sab[to-decline,deteriorate]:Sab		VerbSuffix;
poQ[to-demand,to-require]:poQ			VerbSuffix;
Qaw'[to-destroy]:Qaw'				VerbSuffix;
ngab[to-disappear,to-vanish]:ngab		VerbSuffix;
Hon[to-doubt]:Hon				VerbSuffix;
naj[to-dream]:naj				VerbSuffix;
Sop[to-eat]:Sop					VerbSuffix;
chu'[to-engage,activate]:chu'			VerbSuffix;
jun[to-evade,take-evasive-action]:jun		VerbSuffix;
pum[to-fall]:pum				VerbSuffix;
Suv[to-fight]:Suv				VerbSuffix;
baH[to-fire]:baH				VerbSuffix;
pab[to-follow]:pab				VerbSuffix;
Suq[to-get,acquire]:Suq			VerbSuffix;
jaH[to-go,to-travel]:jaH			VerbSuffix;
muS[to-hate,to-detest]:muS			VerbSuffix;
Qoy[to-hear]:Qoy				VerbSuffix;
tul[to-hope]:tul				VerbSuffix;
ngu'[identify]:ngu'				VerbSuffix;
Hech[to-intend]:Hech				VerbSuffix;
pol[to-keep,to-save]:pol			VerbSuffix;
HoH[to-kill]:HoH				VerbSuffix;
Hagh[to-laugh]:Hagh				VerbSuffix;
ghoj[to-learn]:ghoj				VerbSuffix;
nep[to-lie,to-fib]:nep				VerbSuffix;
yIn[to-live]:yIn				VerbSuffix;
ghom[to-meet]:ghom				VerbSuffix;
Sutlh[to-negotiate]:Sutlh			VerbSuffix;
DIl[to-pay]:DIl					VerbSuffix;
maS[to-prefer]:maS				VerbSuffix;
bot[to-prevent]:bot				VerbSuffix;
laD[to-read]:laD				VerbSuffix;
chup[to-recommend,to-suggest]:chup		VerbSuffix;
ratlh[to-remain]:ratlh				VerbSuffix;
leS[to-rest,to-relax]:leS			VerbSuffix;
Daw'[to-revolt]:Daw'				VerbSuffix;
jatlh[to-say,to-tell]:jatlh			VerbSuffix;
ghIj[to-scare]:ghIj				VerbSuffix;
legh[to-see]:legh				VerbSuffix;
ngeH[to-send]:ngeH				VerbSuffix;
bom[to-sing,chant]:bom				VerbSuffix;
Qong[to-sleep]:Qong				VerbSuffix;
HaD[to-study]:HaD				VerbSuffix;
Qap[to-succeed]:Qap				VerbSuffix;
mer[to-surprise]:mer				VerbSuffix;
tlhap[to-take]:tlhap				VerbSuffix;
chen[to-take-form]:chen			VerbSuffix;
mugh[to-translate]:mugh			VerbSuffix;
toj[to-trick]:toj				VerbSuffix;
lo'[to-use]:lo'					VerbSuffix;
neH[to-want,to-desire]:neH			VerbSuffix;
ghItlh[to-write]:ghItlh			VerbSuffix;
